Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Number of Reviews
30

Author
Curtis Edmonds
Chances are, you've either been in this situation or know someone who
has -- or both.  It happens all the time -- a smart, talented, and
bright person who makes a bad decision about a relationship.  There's
always the question, "How could somebody so smart do something so
stupid?"  And there really isn't a good answer to that (not even if
you're the President).  Sometimes your heart gets you into situations
that your head can't get you out of.
Out of Sight is ostensibly a heist movie, but that's not where the real
action is.  The plan is for bank robber par excellence Jack Foley (the
dashing and charming George Clooney) to break out of a Florida prison
and, along with partner Buddy Bragg (Ving Rhames), rob a Detroit
multimillionaire (Albert Brooks, who proves that even multimillionaires
can be schmucks).  And if the movie had been about that, it might have
been a good middle-of-the-road action picture.
Instead, one tiny little thing goes wrong, and that one tiny little
thing elevates Out of Sight far beyond the level of the ordinary.
Deputy United States Marshal Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez) shows up at
the jailbreak to deliver a court summons and ends up being stuffed in
the truck with Foley on the long ride back to Miami.  They're in a tight
space, romantically lit by the brakelights, Clooney's hand is on Lopez's
thigh ("but in a nice way"), and even though she's a cop and he's a
robber, and even though he must smell wretched, there are some sparks
there.  It sounds like it's a ludicrous situation for romance to
develop, but it does.  And it's wholly believable on film, even though
it doesn't sound like it on paper.
Example:  There's a scene early on where Clooney and Rhames are trapped
in a Miami hotel, hemmed in by the FBI and a bucketful of slow-moving
senior citizens.  Lopez's job is to watch the elevator and yell if she
spots Clooney.  The door opens, their eyes meet... and she lets him go.
Sounds stupid, right?  But you have to see the way their eyes meet to
understand what they're both thinking, what they're feeling, how things
might work out under different circumstances.  It's a scene where the
actors, deprived for a moment of the routinely splendid Elmore Leonard
dialogue, have to sell the movie -- and they do so effectively.
If the Clooney-Lopez romance was all there was to Out of Sight, it would
still be an entertaining movie.  Clooney is always fun to watch, and
(like Harrison Ford) at his best when asked to play a charming rogue.
Lopez is wonderful, somehow finding a way to be hard-nosed and sensuous
at the same time.  The chemistry between the two is captivating -- but
at the same time, they're probably the least interesting characters in
the movie.  The strength of the movie is in the supporting characters,
parts that are blessed with meaty Leonard dialogue, that are well-cast,
and are entertaining as can be.
You see the craftsmanship in big roles like Clooney's partner Buddy, who
can't stop confessing his sins to his sister.  After his breakthrough
role in Pulp Fiction, Rhames has usually made to play tough-guy roles,
and it's a treat to see him in a meatier part.  Don Cheadle, effective
and smart as a small-screen district attorney in Picket Fences, has the
tough-guy role here, and manages to be menacing and comical at turns.
But even the smaller roles are well done:  Steve Zahn as the stoner
getaway driver, Luis Guzmán (the bartender in Boogie Nights) as a dim
escapee, Dennis Farina as Lopez's overprotective father, Samuel L.
Jackson and Michael Keaton dropping in from parallel Leonard universes.
Out of Sight is a treat, like a big glass of rich hot chocolate during a
Michigan winter.  Intelligent, well acted, well scripted, and with an
eye for human foibles and an ear for snappy dialogue, Out of Sight
delivers what most summer movies seem to have lost in the mail.  Stephen
Soderburgh has created a sparking gem of a movie -- which deserves more
than to be shuffled in with the dull, lifeless films we've seen so far
this year.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Tabasco sauce is to bachelor cooking what forgiveness is to sin."

Author
Marty Mapes
**1/2 (out of 4) Too often, a movie with lots of momentum loses it all at a
crucial scene. It happened in this film when a character accidentally killed
himself. The movie seemed to play up this gruesome scene as comedy, and my
audience laughed at it. The pressure to find this scene funny was awkward
and disquieting, and it made me respect the film much less. 
This movie has a lot going for it. For one, the story was written by Elmore
Leonard, whose offbeat crime dramas inevitably make for good movies. GET
SHORTY, JACKIE BROWN, and now OUT OF SIGHT make an interesting trio of capers. 
The style and look of the movie held together nicely. The simplified
four-color poster for the movie tells us to expect a late sixties/early
seventies action movie, and that's what the movie delivers. It captured the
feel of those great cops-and-robbers TV shows without parodying them, and
without setting the movie in that era. The music, the sideburns, the liberal
use of freeze frames and quick zooms add to the overall impression of a
solid late-sixties crime drama. 
The movie is actually set in the present. Jack Foley (George Clooney) is a
smooth bank robber. He helps his victims relax and obey with his casual air.
Unfortunately, his car doesn't run so smooth and he gets sent to prison
where he makes some connections for when he gets out. There's Glenn (Steve
Zahn), who has a tip on a big score, Ripley (Albert Brooks), who blabs about
his wealth, making himself a target, Buddy (Ving Rhames), and Snoopy (Don
Cheadle), who rules Detroit. 
Foley breaks out of prison with the help of Glenn, but their plan is
somewhat hampered by the appearance of a federal Marshall, Karen Sisco
(Jennifer Lopez). She gets locked in a trunk with Foley as they make their
getaway. Foley comes on to her and she isn't entirely unreceptive. Finally
she escapes, and so does he. 
Foley works his way to Detroit, looking for one last big score while Sisco
works her way there on his trail. She is looking for him both professionally
and personally, and he won't be too sorry if she catches him. The night
before the big heist, they meet in a bar, and they try to work out which one
will give up their career for the other. 
And soon thereafter, the momentum dies an ugly gruesome death. 
(To be fair, nobody else has criticized the accidental death scene and I can
only assume that, for most people, it wasn't a problem. Mentally give this
movie an extra half-star if you're not squeamish.) 
Veteran editor Anne V. Coates used lots of good technique. There were a few
places where the cut from one scene to the next makes a wry visual joke. For
example, after Foley's getaway car won't start, Coates cuts directly to him
in prison. When Sisco has Foley trapped, Coates cuts to a scene of her in
the hospital with a broken nose. In addition, she had a good feel for the
chemistry between Lopez and Clooney, letting their eyes linger just long
enough before cutting to the other. 
All in all, this movie is a step or two above average. The writing,
chemistry, editing, and momentum PROBABLY made up for any deficiencies.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Edwin Jahiel
OUT OF SIGHT ** 1/2  Directed by Steven Soderbergh. Written by Scott Frank,
based on the novel by Elmore Leonard. Photography, Elliot Davis. Editing,
Ann V.Coates. Production design, Gary Frutkoff. Music, David Holmes. Cast:
George Clooney (Jack Foley), Jennifer Lopez (Karen Sisco), Ving Rhames
(Buddy Bragg), Don Cheadle (Maurice "Snoopy" Miller), Dennis Farina
(Marshall Sisco), Albert Brooks (Richard Ripley), Steve Zahn (Glenn
Michaels), Isaiah Washington (Kenneth), Luis Guzman (Chino),  Catherine
Keener (Adele), Keith Loneker (White Boy Bob), Nancy Allen (Midge), also
Michael Keaton & Samuel L. Jackson. Produced by Danny DeVito, Michael
Shamberg, Stacy Sher. Executive producers, Barry Sonnenfeld, John Hardy. A
Jersey film released by Universal. 120 minutes. R (language, violence,
sex).
Some movie titles have a facile built-in zinger that can be used by
reviewers who don't like the film. Here it would be "Out of Sight, Out of
Mind." But so far as I know, there are hardly any critical put-downs.The
picture is getting very good-to-excellent reactions. Yet so far as I am
concerned, the Out of Mind bit does apply--but not as a would-be-scathing
comment. Let me explain.
OOS is amusing and inventive, but at the same time, it moves in such a
here-and-there, this-and-that fashion that I find it hard to replay it in
my mind. Put it this way: it has not left in me any repercussions, the
feeling that it is both "rememberable" and memorable. Rather, it is instant
gratification. I do grant you that judgments on many a film become valid
only after a second screening, but I've had no time to do this. When it
does happen, the movie may go up a half-star, or down.
It opens with a tricky, clever and funny  flashback. Simpatico George
Clooney plays Jack Foley, an incorrigible bank robber. He works without
weapons and apparently gets caught  each time.Whether he is a dumb planner
or an unlucky heister, is none too clear. I am intrigued by the name Foley.
In the Beverly Hills Cop series, Eddie Murphy was Axel Foley. Except for
their sense of humor, in  many ways Jack the Robber is the opposite of Axel
the Lawman.
Cut to Jack's current prison. Laid-back Foley and his buddy Buddy (sic)
(Ving Rhames) break out. (The technicalities are not detailed as in
traditional  jailbreak flicks). In the process (don't ask) they kidnap US
Marshal  Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez). A reference to Siskel and Ebert? To
the Cisco Kid?
Buddy drives the getaway car, Karen and Jack, hidden in the trunk, have an
amusing but unlikely flirtatious conversation -- the beginning of a
beautiful affair in which Jack is after Karen romantically. She responds
but  is also professionally after Jack.
The source novel is by Elmore Leonard, whose idiosyncratic thrillers or
action tales have hordes of admirers. Many of his books were made into
films, including Jackie Brown, Get Shorty, Joe Kidd, Hombre, 52
Pick-up.Leonard has co-scripted some, also written original  scenarios.
This picture is a big change in subject and style for director Soderbergh.
After his first film ,Sex, Lies, and Videotape (1989) won the Golden Palm
at Cannes, he became an instant "auteur" icon, a star among the avant-garde
of the American New Wave cinema. Rather than go commercial, he went on to
more or less low-budget "art" films. These did badly at the box-office and
by many critics. Yet his Kafka is interesting, King of the Hill very good
(and rather mainstreamish). The Underneath, Schizopolis, Gray's Anatomy,
got him nowhere. Now, his decision to shift gears into full mainstream is
paying off handsomely.
Out of Sight is certainly a mass-appeal movie. The plot is convoluted in a
sometimes outlandish combination of Soderberghisms and Leonardisms. It
certainly requires suspension of disbelief. In two hours, so much is thrown
in that there's enough to feed two or three different films.The dialogue
and the banter can sound outrageous but I sensed the planning and planting
of colorfulness or cuteness in it.
It all  feels like a hybrid: a tall tale for the majority of viewers, along
with unexpected, even gratuitous, narrative and technical slants, sorties
and sallies by the experimentalist who lies in Soderbergh's psyche.
Absurdism, expressionism and filmic unorthodoxy may not be the film's main
traits, yet they're still very much present. At times, those are welcome
touches. At times they slow down the picture, interfere with its momentum,
as in a sequence of the couple doing goo-goo eyes by a picture window, way
up in a hotel bar. The rain outside is as phoney as any I've seen.  But the
excellent,entertaining acting of all involved is the movie's greatest asset.
Essentially OOS belongs to the familiar sub-genre of comedies about
fumbling thieves or outlaws. It could have been worse. Or better.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Steven Soderbergh
Writer: Scott Frank (based on the novel by Elmore Leonard)
Starring: George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle, Steve
Zahn, Albert Brooks, Dennis Farina, Catherine Keener, Isaiah Washington,
Luis Guzmán, Nancy Allen, Donna Frenzel, Keith Loneker, Michael Keaton,
Samuel L. Jackson
There are two reasons why I just love to read and/or watch Elmore Leonard
novels/adaptations: a) they're so unpredictable, and b) they have quite
frankly the most interesting characters than anything that comes out today.
 The world of Elmore Leonard is filled with interesting characters of
varying intelligence, who all at some point get to step into the foreground
and mouth off to the audience.  The plots are piloted only by them, and we
read/watch with intensity, trying to follow the plethora of characters as
they twist and turn the plot, never leaving us behind and never allowing us
to predict what will happen next.
This is something that Hollywood isn't usually able to handle, but for some
reason, the past three Leonard adaptations - "Get Shorty," "Jackie Brown,"
and this - are incredibly faithful not just to the plotting of the
respective novels, but to their overall feel.  In the past, reading and
watching Leonard adaptations were totally different, but now, it's like
Hollywood has had an epiphany: they've taken the time to read his novels,
understand what makes them so compelling, and hire the right directors to
create them in celluloid form.
If I had never seen "Get Shorty" or "Jackie Brown," I would have proclaimed
"Out of Sight" the best and most fascinating Leonard adaptation.  It fully
understands the way that Leonard feels, allows each character to glow
radiantly, develops some real depth to the film to connect to the audience,
and even has an emotional core.  It even has completely amazing
performances, and turns its two leads, who have both had a bit of trouble
connecting to audiences in the past, into great Hollywood stars in the
tradition of Bogart and Bacall or Tracy and Hepburn (or even Allen and
Keaton).  Is it substantially weaker than the other two films?  No way;
it's right up there with them.
The protagonists of "Out of Sight" are one bank robber and one Federal
Marshall.  Jack Foley (George Clooney, growing his old hair back and
ditching the old school-Doug Ross stuff...not that that was a bad thing) is
the crook who, in the first unrelated-to-everything-else scene robs a bank
in the most laid back (not to mention most hilarious since Woody Allen
tried to rob a bank in "Take the Money and Run") robbery scene in history
by merely telling the teller that a man sitting at a desk with her boss is
his partner.  Unfortunately, his car stalls and he winds up in prison.
Shortly thereafter, the escapes with a little snitching and help from his
friend and assistant, Buddy Bragg (Ving Rhames, still glowing).  But in the
process, he manages to kidnap a tough Federal Marshall dressed in a Chanel
dress, Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez), the other main protagonist.  He stuffs
himself in the trunk with her, and on the way to a rendezvous, chats up
with her about, of all things, the career of Faye Dunaway, discussing
"Bonnie and Clyde," "Network," and "Three Days of the Condor."  He lets her
go and all, but the two both have an attraction and obsession with one
another.
The obsession grows as Jack and Buddy team up with a vicious criminal he
knew from prison, Maurice "Snoopy" Miller (Don Cheadle, showing off his
versatility as an actor once again), to do a job on a sleazy billionaire
they also knew from prison, Richard Ripley (a balding Albert Brooks - so
that WAS a toupee!), who squealed that he had a collection of uncut
diamonds somewhere in his mansion.  Meanwhile, the FBI is trying to track
Jack down with the help of Karen, who can't decide if she wants to catch
him because he's a crook or because she's totally attracted to him.
The film was directed by Steven Soderbergh, who hit the big time back about
a decade ago with the film that launched the craze for independent films,
"sex, lies, and videotape," but has had a rough time making movies since. 
Instead of playing it for laughs like Barry Sonnenfeld did with "Get
Shorty," or playing it straight like Quentin Tarantino did with "Jackie
Brown," Soderbergh directs it with a masterful touch of emotional and
psychological depth.  He freezes frames at key moments, intercuts two
scenes to form one, and uses the humor as a break from the intensity of the
rest of the film.  The screenplay by Scott Frank (of "Dead Again" fame) is
as complex as Soderbergh's direction: he forms the plot so that the film
plays in often non-linear form, throwing in unanounced flashbacks so that
much of the film plays as a series of memories and thoughts of respective
characters.  This is done so much that when one scene which is shot in a
dream-like state arrives, I wasn't sure if it was real or not.
This is easily the most deep of the Leonard adaptations because while "Get
Shorty" was a satire on Hollywood and "Jackie Brown" was just a
psychological caper film, "Out of Sight" actually connects to the audience.
 The two protagonists are easily likable, and their obsession with one
another is the driving force of the film.  We care about these two, and we
see that their relationship is really a tragedy: they're torn between their
love for one another and the boundaries of what they are.  In effect, the
film actually says more about the relationship between cops and robbers
than "Heat" did, and just as an added cherry, the scene where the two
characters take a break and sit down for a drink, which was the most
hyped-up (not to mention the most anticlimactic) scene of the film, is
twenty times better.
The film's basically a battle between what people do for a living and what
they really could be, a battle between a romance film and a pulpy thriller.
 We have a joyously fun caper film here with all the right ingredients
(double crosses upon double crosses, trigger-happy characters, rich
asswholes getting their just deserts, and even some irony), but we also
have a wonderful love story, easily the best of the Leonard adaptions (the
ones in "Get Shorty" and "Jackie Brown" were more sweet than this is), and
acted with just the right amount of sexual chemistry by Clooney and Lopez. 
These two characters have only three or four scenes together, but when they
talk, you just hold your breath in case something amazing happens.  And it
does.
And of course, there are those little things that you have to love about
this film, like the two big shock cameos that pop up (one a tie-in with
"Jackie Brown"), that gory death towards the end which is the funniest one
of those since the head shot in "Pulp Fiction," the opening bank robbery
scene, the opening of the safe in Brooks' house, and two hilarious
supporting roles by Tom DiCillo's wife, Catherine Keener, and Steve Zahn as
a stoner "colleague" of Jack's, who shows to mainstream audiences the knack
for comedy he has shown in other smaller films.  There's nary a dull moment
or character in an Elmore Leonard novel, and it's amazing that a film based
on one of his novels has realized how to appropriately connect two
characters emotionally with their audience.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Jason Overbeck
Out of Sight is a continuation of the ever growing film adaptations of
Elmore Leonard novels, and if they continue to be this good as this I
will welcome an entire genre.  Out of Sight is not only as good as
Tarantino's film Jackie Browne it also raises the stakes aiming to be
billed as a companion piece to Pulp Fiction.  This is clearly one of the
best films of the year.
Jack Foley (Clooney) has robbed more than 200 banks in his life and
never with the use of a gun.  His approach to bank robbery is as laid
back as you can imagine, he finds the way to say all the right things
and walk out of the bank with large sums of money.  At the beginning of
the film he gets arrested when his car won't start.  After a prison
break Foley is locked in the trunk with a feisty U.S. Marshall named
Sisco (Lopez) they have a long conversation about crime, life and
movies.
The story is further complicated by a large array of supporting
characters who all seem to be trying to get a piece of the uncut
diamonds owned by Ripley (Brooks), a wall street tycoon who Foley help
survive in prison.  The various character motivations are further
complicated by Out of Sight's nonlinear timeline until you are not sure
who will and has done what to whom and exactly when.
The film is not nearly as complicated as it may seem because it is
wonderfully directed by Steven Soderbergh (who hit it big with Sex, Lies
& Videotape nine years ago).  Soderbergh while keeping the characters
and motivations straight has a lot of fun with the look of the film.  He
freezes the frame at times to raise awareness and also to add a musical
quality to the images.  Giving the film the technical quality you might
expect from the always-experimental Soderbergh.
At the core of Out of Sight is the chemistry between Clooney and Lopez,
who attack their relationship with the restraint shown by Max Cherry and
Jackie Browne, but also with more recklessness as their ages and
personalities will allow.  Soderbergh wisely chooses to keep the sex
scene discrete and lays dialogue from their meeting over it.  This keeps
you paying attention to their wit and intelligence rather than their
bodies, which are as finely shaped as the script by Scott Frank.
Both leads are quite good as Clooney comes into his own and finds a
comfortable style that suggests the humor of Mel Gibson.  Also very fine
in this film is supporting work by Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle, Dennis
Farina and Albert Brooks (who doesn't appear in enough movies).  If you
are tired of the parade of stupid movies fed on you go see Out of Sight,
a smart and very funny film.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Steven Soderbergh
Cast:  George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Dennis Farina, Don
Cheadle, Albert Brooks, Steve Zahn, Catherine Keener
Screenplay:  Scott Frank
Producers:  Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg, Stacey Sher
Runtime:  120 min.
US Distribution:  Universal
Rated R:  violence, language, sex
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        Perhaps it's time for me to say a little about my reading habits.  I
really do like to read, and I've enjoyed many books in my lifetime.  My
problem is that I'm a slow reader, and not very dedicated -- I'll enjoy
portions of a book and then set it down for months at a time (it's taken
me the last six weeks to get through the first one hundred pages of Anna
Karenina, even though I'm loving the book).  In addition to this, I
typically don't read anything created after the 19th century.  The only
reason I bother with this bit of information is because I feel bad
admitting, time after time, that I haven't read any of the books on
which these films are based (the only exception, I believe, is Great
Expectations).  
        However, I don't think it should be necessary to read the book
beforehand in order to judge the quality of the film.  Needless to say,
I haven't read the Elmore Leonard novel Out of Sight, on which Steven
Soderbergh's new film is based.  I can't say how faithful of an
adaptation it is, or if it lives up to Leonard's vision.  I can say that
it's a terrific film, with sharp acting, great dialogue, and pumping
full of energy and style injected by Soderbergh.  It's certainly a nice
distraction from 1998's lineup of brainless blockbusters, all hopelessly
wishing that size mattered.  Out of Sight proves that it doesn't.
        I had originally written George Clooney off as a one-note actor,
incapable of depth but occasionally showing a little flair.  After
seeing his latest performance in this film, I've changed my mind -- this
guy can act, but he also has that forceful presence that most certainly
will make him one of those $20 million superstars.  Here, he plays Jack
Foley, a middle aged guy who robs banks for a living.  He does it
because it's fun, I think, but the film opens with him getting caught
because his car won't start.
        He goes to jail -- which is interesting -- only to break out five
cinematic minutes later with the help of his friend, Buddy (Ving
Rhames).  We're then introduced to Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez), a U.S.
Marshall who, conveniently, is waiting with a shotgun as Jack escapes. 
Fortunately, they take her hostage, and she and Jack spend some quality
time in the trunk together as Buddy drives them to safety.  The central
conflict arises when both Jack and Karen become obsessed with one
another, though their respective jobs make them superficially
incompatible.
        We soon learn that the film is not told in sequence (and, since this is
a gritty crime comedy, flashbacks of Pulp Fiction should arise).  At
first, I kind of felt that it was a gimmick, but I guess it was a
gimmick in Pulp Fiction, too.  It's a fun gimmick, though, and
Soderbergh treats the material with enough humor that everything comes
off naturally.  I've only seen a few of Soderbergh's films (I was
impressed both with Kafka and sex, lies, and videotape), but I think
he's excellent at what he does.  He's an artist without making it
obvious, and without being pretentious, which is always admirable.  He
uses tricks, yes (lots of freeze-frame stuff here), but it all adds to
the smooth and quirky currents in the film.
        As I said, Clooney is terrific, and he's matched by Lopez.  Lopez is,
of course, beautiful, but she can act, too.  I can sense that she's
honing in on her skills, for she comes off more natural here than she
has in any of her previous ventures (not that Stone gave her much help
in the loathsome U-Turn).  The two actors have arresting chemistry with
one another -- the best scene in the film, by far, is the seduction
scene.  The brilliance of this scene is also due, in part, to
Soderbergh, for he cuts back and forth from their quiet discussion in a
bar to the physical act which takes place a few minutes later.  The
scene is a series of soft nuances and glances, layered upon light
dialogue, and the result is one of the better love scenes in recent
cinema -- meaningful and engrossing.
        The supporting cast is strong, led by the always-reliable Ving Rhames. 
Dennis Farina, who plays Karen's father, is good, as is Don Cheadle as
the profoundly stupid villain.  Steve Zahn, who plays Jack's
nearly-brain dead accomplice Glenn, steals all of his scenes (and that's
in a film where every scene is already at a high level).  All of the
actors are helped by the dialogue and the intelligently-constructed
script by Scott Frank.
        Out of Sight is certainly a light film, although there are a few heavy
moments that will linger in the memory.  Overall, I can recommend it
simply as great entertainment.  Not every film has to change your life,
and it's nice to see a movie that uses the art to tell a great story and
simply to entertain its viewers.  As for the book, this film is good
enough to make me believe that there might be something in the text
worth looking at.

Author
Steve Kong
George Clooney's last few big screen expeditions range from mediocre
(Peacemaker) to outright awful (Batman and Robin). Clooney is a good actor
and really does deserve more. Is Out of Sight the movie that will make him
a superstar?
Based on the Elmore Leonard book by the same name, the movie follows a bank
robber with a heart of gold, Jack Foley (Clooney), and federal marshal
Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez). Foley is an intelligent, charming, and
big-time bank robber who has robbed so many banks that he's lost count.
With all of this, the only thing setting him back is his problem with cars.
Sisco is a hard-nosed federal marshal who on a routine trip to the Glades
Correctional facility in Florida runs into Foley trying to breakout of the
same correctional facility.
The two have instant chemistry - both as characters and as on-screen
actors. But, therein lies the problem - how can a federal officer be
interested in a guy who she knows clearly broke out of prison? What will
she do if she meets him again? Will she put him back in the slammer? Will
they run away together?
Out of Sight is the third Leonard based film I've seen, along with Touch
and Get Shorty. Out of Sight is my favourite of the three. The combination
of a densely plotted script, believable characters, great acting, and
wonderful music makes Out of Sight a movie that can't be missed.
This is going to be the sleeper hit of the summer. As a movie that hasn't
been overly advertised and has more story than special effects, Out of
Sight will make a big draw with the people that want to see a funny and
intelligent film during the summer. This is going to be the movie that
makes George Clooney a superstar.
Clooney loses all his neck and head twitches that he uses in ER and adopts
a more confident style for Out of Sight. This time his character is not
Doctor Ross in a different environment. Clooney's character is not the
typical criminal with a heart of gold, though. Most criminals we see with a
heart of gold are bumbling idiots and not intelligent. Foley though is
intelligent; watch how he takes care of different situations: The first
bank robbery that we see, the prison library incident, and the prison
escape all show how this guy thinks.
Lopez is in every way Clooney's equal. Lopez's acting is superb. Her
character, Sisco, is a tough federal marshal who has a soft side - she
takes no crap from anyone, makes her own decisions, and sticks to them.
Watch how she reacts to these different situations: dealing with the
brother of a convict, dealing with Foley, and dealing with a drug addict.
Among the supporting cast, there is a lot to like. Ving Rhames as Buddy,
Jack Foley's only friend, is wonderful. He plays his character with a sense
of vulnerability that you don't often find in a car-jacker. Dennis Farina
as Karen's father is hilarious. I love what he did when he met with Karen's
boyfriend (a surprise cameo by Michael Keaton). Albert Brooks is good in
his role as a white-collar-criminal. The only performance I didn't like -
and this maybe because he's playing against what I'm used to seeing him as
- is Don Cheadle as a vicious gangster criminal.
Given that this is the summer season, I'd expect a lot of movies to be
visually arresting. And so far all of the movies that I've seen are quite
visual. But, not of them have what, surprisingly to me, George Clooney's
new film Out of Sight has: visual style. The style used in Out of Sight is
useful, beautiful, and jarring. I loved the visual style of the film. The
director, Steven Soderbergh, and cinematographer, Elliot Davis, use
different styles of movie making to accomplish a polished film in the end.
I loved how they used the freeze frame repeatedly to imprint the reactions
of the characters in our minds. I've not seen the freeze frame used a lot,
and the only director that uses it this often is my favourite, John Woo.
Also, watch for how the tone of the film changes between the two main
settings. In Florida, the film is warm and full of vibrant color. But, when
the film moves to Detroit, it becomes cold and almost colorless.
Out of Sight is a well-written, funny, and engaging film that will make
George Clooney a superstar. Don't Miss Out of Sight.

Author
David Butterworth
        Allen, star of many a Brian DePalma movie in the early eighties,
has a brief, throwaway part towards the end of "Out of Sight," as the maid
of a crooked financier.  In keeping with her past performances, Allen wears
little more than a green velvet Victoria's Secret ensemble which begs the
question, did they really need a costume designer for this?
        "Out of Sight" is not likely to secure Ms. Allen the kind of
plaudits bestowed upon Pam Grier, who likewise returned from out of
obscurity to appear in another recent Elmore Leonard adaptation, "Jackie
Brown," but it is intriguing to see her name kicking off the "also
starring" credits given her limited screen time.
        The real stars of "Out of Sight" are George Clooney ("Batman &
Robin" by way of "E.R.") and Jennifer Lopez ("Selena"), whose winning
chemistry, coupled with Steven Soderbergh's freeze-frame directorial
technique, help the film retain the charismatic charm of Leonard's original
work.
        With the success of "Get Shorty" three years ago, filmmakers have
realized that adapting an Elmore Leonard novel can be an easier proposition
than trying to dream up a storyline from scratch.
        In "Out of Sight," Clooney stars as Jack Foley, a career criminal
who specializes in unarmed robbery--he just waltzes into banks and politely
makes a withdrawal, claiming that his "partner" (just another customer it
so happens) will shoot the manager if the teller doesn't comply.  For all
of Jack's nice-guy charm though, he's not very lucky.  His latest scam
lands him in Florida's Glades Correctional Facility.
        Federal Marshal Karen Sisco (Lopez) coincidentally arrives at the
prison just as Jack and his buddy (Ving Rhames, typically appealing) are
breaking out.  There's a brief struggle and Jack bundles himself and Karen
into the trunk of the getaway car.  It's in these cramped confines, pressed
intimately together, that Jack and Karen start falling for one another.
        The mutual attraction continues as the couple on opposite sides of
the law slip in and out of one another's grasp.  Karen follows Jack to
Detroit, where he's about to pull off another heist, this time a cache of
uncut diamonds from incarcerated businessman Richard Ripley (played by a
toupee-sporting Albert Brooks, almost unrecognizable in the prison scenes).
        It's during this final caper-gone-awry that Allen makes her scant
appearance.
        Clooney's range as an actor is limited, but he has undeniable
charm.  Lopez, too, is easy on the eyes, but she demonstrates more depth in
her portrayal of Karen, a tough yet tender professional.  She dispenses
with hit men as easily as she out-maneuvers sleazy pick-up artists in a
bar.  Especially cute is a sequence in which Karen fantasizes about Jack in
a motel bathtub.
        Admirably supporting Clooney and Lopez are Don Cheadle as fellow
felon Maurice 'Snoopy' Miller, Steve Zahn as the perennially stoned Glenn
Michaels, and Dennis Farina as Karen's dad, who affectionately buys her a
piece.
        Add a couple of uncredited cameos from "Jackie Brown" cast members
and "Out of Sight" proves to be a lot of fun.  Not as hip and clever as
"Shorty," perhaps, or as complex and colorful as "Brown," but loads of fun
nonetheless.

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Scott Frank, based on a novel by Elmore Leonard
Starring: George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames
Ingredients: Male bank robber, female federal marshall, true love
Synopsis:
A gentleman con man named Foley (George Clooney) busts out of jail with
the help of his friend Buddy (Ving Rhames). Their plans are complicated
by the accidental presence of federal marshall Karen Sisco (Jennifer
Lopez), whom they have to hide temporarily in the trunk of the car,
along with Foley. 
While in the trunk, Foley and Karen realize that they are both lonely,
both photogenic, and both people who enjoy romantic risks. If it weren't
for the fact of being on opposites sides of the law, they could be a
couple. Karen escapes, and the rest of the movie is mainly about their
attraction, not so much about action. When Karen learns Foley will be in
Detroit for a burglary, their attraction gets a second chance. 
Will he catch her or not? Will she catch him or not? Will they have an
argument? Will he fantasize about her? Will she fantasize about him? 
And will the ending be happy, tragic, or end with a nod and a wink?
Opinion:
In OUT OF SIGHT charmers George Clooney and Jennifer Lopez stand out in
marked contrast to anyone in this movie who is non-beautiful, since
non-beautiful main characters (especially Hispanics) are portrayed as
all dreadfully dorky, unintelligent, vindictive, and grossly
incompetent. Actually Karen Sisco (Lopez) is also incompetent any time
she's matching professional wits with bank robber Foley, but luckily she
always suddenly regains her toughness and intellect when dealing with
anyone else. Contrived, but hey, it's a romance. The thing is, I always
wonder is why there always has to be a weaker sex in a formular romance.
On the other hand, fans who enjoy the sight of George Clooney or
Jennifer Lopez will enjoy this movie, as it provides lots of glamorous
footage of these two stars in different clothing, hair colors, and
hairstyles, along with charming dialogue and flirtatious lines.
One interesting thing about the script OUT OF SIGHT is how it jumps back
and forth between prison conversations in a facility in Florida and
earlier conversations in a facility in Lompoc, California to show how
and when Foley met various criminal acquaintances. 
As long as fans know to be expecting a slow romance, rather than a
hard-hitting drama or action movie, the conversation in OUT OF SIGHT
should be enjoyable. The main idea ("What if a bank robber falls for
cop?") is never left out of sight. 
Copyright Š 1998 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Dennis Schwartz
OUT OF SIGHT (director:Steven Soderbergh; cast: George Clooney, Jennifer
Lopez, Ving Rhames, Dennis Farina, Don Cheadle, Albert Brooks, Steve
Zahn, Catherine Keener, 1998)
Elmore Leonard novels have become staples for the movies in recent
times, they become movies easily translated into money making glossy
thrillers, noted for their amusing dialogue and smartly made stories.
This film is no exception. It is entertainment for those who like fun
pictures, placing no other demands on the filmmaker.
Clooney and Lopez work well together, there is a chemistry between them
on screen that belies the unbelievability of the story they are in.
Clooney is Jack Foley, anti-hero hero, non-violent bank robber, robbed
200 banks with just a smile, a real smoothy, but he gets caught robbing
a bank and is sent to jail in Florida, but escapes. Jennifer Lopez is
Karen Sisco, federal marshal, who happens to witness the jail break, and
is taken hostage by Jack and his buddy, Buddy (Ving), who is driving the
getaway car. They throw her into the trunk of the car and Jack joins
her, striking up a friendly conversation, while gently caressing her
thigh in the tight quarters they are in. The magical attraction between
these two, is very cleverly highlighted in this scene.
Jack and Buddy are off to Detroit to score a diamond robbery, something
Jack got wind of behind bars, as a crooked, weasely Wall Streeter,
Richard Ripley (Albert Brooks), blabbed to another prisoner that he has
$5 million in uncut diamonds stashed away in his house. The only thing
keeping Jack from being in wintry Detroit and going through with the
heist, is that he wants to romance Karen. She is intent on arresting him
and moving up the ladder in the F.B.I. chain of command. But to
complicate matters, she is also taken with his good looks and charm.
The cast is fine. Steve Zahn plays Glenn, and is as funny as hell as a
drugged out thief. Don Cheadle is vicious as Snoopy Miller, ex-con and
detestable prisonmate of Jack's. Dennis Farina is pleasantly sardonic as
Karen's dad and confidante.
The film is violent, it is sexy, it has romance and comedy in it, in
fact, it has just about everything in it, except real intelligence, but
then again, what results is a quick-paced actioner, that is easy to
watch, and easy for the viewer to let his hair down a bit and be less
critical, for this film is a well-conceived star vehicle that works on
all cylinders of the entertainment scale.
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: June 26, 1998
Starring: George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle,
Dennis Farina, Steve Zahn, Michael Keaton, Samuel L. Jackson
Directed by: Steven Soderbergh
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (language, some strong violence) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/outofsight.htm
Amidst a rather noisy summer of asteroids, aliens, and masked Mexican
bandits comes this rather unassuming gem about money, love, and mo'
money. Written by Scott Frank (HEAVEN'S PRISONERS) in a quirky,
ultra-hip style and laced with a retro-cool soundtrack, there's more
than enough story and sizzile here to go around for all of the other
summer movies. Marked by one critic to be the only summer film with sex
in it (the closest competitor being THE X-FILES' one half-kiss), the
character love story provides plenty of depth and excitement for an
original concept. 
It stars George Clooney (THE PEACEMAKER) as Jack Foley, a notorious but
aging bank robber who gets nailed making a getaway from a stickup. In
the slammer, he uses some Latino friends to make his daring escape,
shortly thereafter reuniting with his best friend Buddy (Ving Rhames,
CON AIR). The only thing that limits the escape from being perfect is
the coincidental presence of a Federal marshal named Karen Sisco
(Jennifer Lopez, U-TURN). From here, the story takes off into Jack and
Buddy's plan to heist a large sum of uncut diamonds from a source they
had heard about in a previous incarceration together. Their characters
are immediately likeable, in the glorified sort of way that most
good-guy bank robbers are; if anything, Jack and Buddy are present day
versions of THE NEWTON BOYS. 
The acting is of a superb quality here. George Clooney redeems himself
for his last three films, all of which were stinkers, by giving a
toned-down performance. It works out for the better, as though he's
almost more relaxed in a less flamboyant role. Ving Rhames is similarly
pleasurable, and almost every line he says comes out with some degree of
humor due to his low, gravelly voice and stoic facial expressions.
Jennifer Lopez is sensual as ever, lending an eroticism to the crime
caper story. The other supporting roles are just as solid (Don Cheadle,
Dennis Farina, and the stupefying Steve Zahn), and there's even a few
bizarre cameos - Michael Keaton and Samuel L. Jackson make appearances
in the middle and end, respectively. 
There's no doubt that OUT OF SIGHT will be a hit with genre fans,
although it's questionable as to how large that fan base is. Anyone
who's not in tune with the retro-hipness atmophere that the movie exudes
is going to feel, understandably, that the film is too off-the-wall to
be appreciated. On the other hand, those who are of a PULP FICTION
nature will see a product like this as top-of-the-line material,
something that can't be missed for a true follower. On the whole,
there's nothing that can't be enjoyed, and it may simply be too crass or
crude for some types.
FINAL AWARD FOR "OUT OF SIGHT": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Author
James Sanford
Maybe there's some kind of secret universal law that says if you bring
together several unlucky people and make them work together they'll each be
blessed with a happy reversal of fortune.
Certainly the film careers of George Clooney ("Batman and Robin," "The
Peacemaker"), and Jennifer Lopez ("Anaconda," "U-Turn") could safely be
called unspectacular, and director Steven Soderbergh has mostly floundered
since his "sex, lies and videotape" took the world by storm nine years ago.
"Out of Sight," a sensational crime drama and black comedy, should go a long
way toward cleaning up the soiled reputations of everyone involved.
Never has Clooney seemed more alive and appealing than he does here as bank
robber Jack Foley, perhaps because Soderbergh managed to keep him from doing
that irritating chin-drop which has become his much-parodied trademark.
Lopez, who has often seemed like she was operating well below full power in
trash like "Money Train," finally gets a part worthy of her as Karen Cisco,
a sharp U.S. marshal who gets her man in more ways than one. For his part,
Soderbergh incorporates his usual bag of tricks - freeze-frames, zooms, jump
cuts - into an engrossing storyline with the same kind of pretzel logic
"Pulp Fiction" had.
Like last Christmas' "Jackie Brown," "Sight" is based on a novel by Elmore
Leonard. The films share at least one principal in common, and, in a bright
touch, he's played (uncredited) by the same actor who originated the role in
"Jackie." While "Jackie" writer-director Quentin Tarantino seemed
hard-pressed to capture the zestiness of Leonard's characters and still keep
up with his outwardly spiraling plot, Soderbergh, working from Scott Frank's
lightning-fast screenplay, pulls off the trick with ease.
At heart, "Sight" is an unorthodox romance between prison escapee Foley and
Cisco, who pursues him from Miami to Detroit. Both Foley and Cisco take a
secret pleasure in playing with fire - he's constantly fooling around with a
Zippo lighter, while she's had past flings with dangerous guys - and their
mutual obsession creates sparks galore.
Surrounding this potentially fatal attraction is a plot by a crew of Foley's
associates to shakedown ultrawealthy ex-con "Dick the Ripper" (Albert
Brooks) at his Bloomfield Hills estate. Snoop (Don Cheadle) is the
mastermind of the operation, since cohorts Glenn (Steve Zahn) and White Boy
Bob (Keith Loneker) are perilously low on brain-power. Meanwhile, Foley's
loyal partner Buddy (Ving Rhames) feels compelled to confess his sins by
phone to his God-fearing sister, a dangerous habit for a career criminal.
With a savory score by Cliff Martinez complementing its every move, "Sight"
serves up a cornucopia of great moments, lines and performances. Brooks and
Rhames once again prove they can do no wrong, and if the hysterically funny
Zahn doesn't move up to star status after this, you'll know Hollywood has
lost its wits. The movie also has genuine sizzle, as Clooney and Lopez flirt
with an intensity most screen couples can only dream of. A wonderfully
edited encounter between the two in a lounge high above the Motor City may
turn out to be the single sexiest scene of the year.
In short, "Out of Sight" more than lives up to its title. Who says there's
no truth in advertising?

Author
Homer Yen
"Out of Sight" - Clooney Robs Banks, Steals the Show 
Who said that the bad guys were the ones that always ran from the law?
If you find the rare opportunity to talk to a person like Jack Foley
(George Clooney), you'll find out that he's intelligent, personable and
loves the movies.  He has admirable principles, possesses an understated
charm, and is a likable guy.  Never mind the fact that he has been a
bank robber throughout his life, and never mind the fact that he has
just escaped from prison.
During his escape, Foley is forced to take hostage FBI agent Karen Sisco
(Jennifer Lopez).  However, Foley doesn't resort to threats and scare
tactics during this period of tension.  Rather, he is collected and
begins to engage in a conversation about his ex-wife, friends and his
love of movies.  Though she is scared, there's a sort of comfort that
she gets from his voice.  A strange but believable attraction begins to
take shape.  "What if we met under different circumstances," he muses.
Yet despite their developing bond for one another, Sisco knows that she
ultimately must arrest the escaped convict.  Meanwhile, Foley has his
own agenda, which leads him and his friend Buddy (Ving Rhames) to
Detroit where a former inmate now lives.  This inmate (Albert Brooks)
once ill-advisedly bragged how he kept $5 million in diamonds at his
place.  For Foley, this could be his big break.  If he can successfully
pull off the robbery, allude the tenacious Agent Sisco, and also stay
ahead of a rival gang of former inmates who also know of the diamonds,
he can retire and escape to some far away island.
"Out of Sight" incorporates much of the skewed humor, sharp dialogue and
absurdly violent situations seen in "Jackie Brown" and "Get Shorty" (in
fact, all these movies are adapted from work by Author Elmore Leonard).
This is the kind of film where we become more interested in what a
character thinks and not what he does.  Clooney does a terrific job as a
man who is constantly looking for ways to maneuver through various
obstacles in order to reach his goal, whether its finding a way to meet
Sisco or finding the stash of diamonds.  Lopez is also very good and
projects the right look of a woman who wants to make the arrest while
teasing with the idea of first having an affair with him.  Together,
they have chemistry and a smoldering sexuality.  Meanwhile, they are
surrounded by a colorful and rich cast of supporting characters, and
each of them gets ample opportunities to show us how unique, strange,
and odd their crime world is.
The film makes me wonder how interesting it must be to be a part of this
kind of world, as fragile and hostile as it may be.  The film's greatest
pleasure comes from it's dialogue.  Add a funky electronic piano and
bluesy guitar score, and you have a film that looks good, sounds good
and feels hip.

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
When was the last time you were stuck in a traffic jam?  Waiting and
waiting and waiting to get somewhere you REALLY want to be, only to be
held up and when you finally reach your destination, you discover that
it definitely wasn't worth the wait.  That's exactly the feeling
generated by 'Out of Sight' from director Steven Soderbergh whose most
well known film credits include 1989's 'Sex, Lies, and Videotape' and
1991's 'Kafka'.  'Out of Sight' is also based on the novel by Elmore
Leonard whose other works have been turned into movies recently with
last year's 'Jackie Brown', based on Leonard's novel entitled 'Rum
Punch' and 1995's 'Get Shorty', based on Leonard's novel of the same
name.  I must confess that I haven't read the novel 'Out of Sight' but
based on other reviews I've read, some critics are referring to the
original story as a cult novel which explains to a certain extent why it
doesn't make for a very good film.  Cult areas of arts and literature
either find an audience or they don't.  You either love it or you hate
it.  There is no in between.  I was completely turned off by this film
which is unconvincing, meandering and has too many unnecessary
characters that are disposable.
George Clooney stars as a bank robber who has hit somewhere in the
neighbourhood of 200 financial institutions in his career and the film
opens with him committing one of these acts after he storms out of a
building across the street, upset about something, and we find out later
in the film why he did what he did.  He is apprehended in the parking
lot by the authorities after his car won't start in a getaway attempt
and we see his life in "the joint" with others who become key players in
the way the story unfolds.  Also introduced to the audience in the
film's first few minutes is a federal marshal played rather laughably by
Jennifer Lopez.  Her full fledged authority as a federal marshal isn't
even half as convincing as say Jodie Foster's performance in 'The
Silence of the Lambs' and she only played a trainee in the FBI and I
would rather have her on my side in a crisis situation rather than Lopez
who looks better playing sultry and glamourous characters instead of
someone who's gutsy, tough and professional as she tries to be in this
film.
Clooney eventually makes his escape from prison with a certain sense of
ease and is confronted by Lopez on the other side of the fence as she
packs a shotgun but she's overpowered by Clooney and his friend who has
come to pick him up (Ving Rhames).  Lopez eventually makes her escape
with  one of Clooney and Rhames's accomplices, a confused and neurotic
loser played by Steve Zahn who likes wearing sunglasses all the time,
even at night.  Clooney and Rhames hook up with two other thugs they met
in prison.  The other hard nosed criminals are played by the very
talented Don Cheadle (who, incidentally was better in 'Boogie Nights'
than Burt Reynolds was) and Isiah Washington, and their plan for a heist
of monumental proportions is the film's climax.
As 'Out of Sight' progresses, the film shifts back and fourth at times,
like other films in wake of the success of 'Pulp Fiction' and like many
other films in history, 'Pulp Fiction' will be imitated for years to
come through all mediocre attempts and this film is just the latest.
Writer Scott Frank who wrote some of the best dialogue heard in the
movies in the 1990's with 'Get Shorty', disappoints greatly here as he
builds a foundation to his story which is shaky and under developed as
many scenes go around and around in circles and don't really lead
anywhere.  Some of them fall flat on their face as some of the humour is
limp and fine actors such as Albert Brooks and Dennis Farina are
completely wasted.  Soderbergh's direction of this film is bland and
misses the mark as Soderbergh looks like an employee of the film's
script and brings what looks like no sense of his own vision to the
film's sub plots and character configurations.  At least director Barry
Sonnenfeld made the characters in 'Get Shorty' somewhat cartoonish and
still managed to make them convincing as that film had characters you
could latch onto and root for and had others you were glad to see get
the metaphoric pie in the face in their just desserts.  'Out of Sight'
has none of these qualities and is another wasted opportunity for George
Clooney to showcase his true talent.
Clooney has yet to strike gold and has only had one truly great
performance which was in 1996's 'From Dusk Till Dawn' which
co-incidentally is another cult film which was doomed in its second half
but Clooney remained the film's only memorable character.  Giving a
great performance in a great film is something he's still striving for
and he hasn't found it here.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Scott Renshaw
OUT OF SIGHT
(Universal)
Starring:  George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle, Steve
Zahn, Albert Brooks, Dennis Farina, Isaiah Washington, Catherine Keener.
Screenplay:  Scott Frank, based on the novel by Elmore Leonard.
Producers:  Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg, Stacey Sher.
Director:  Steven Soderbergh.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, sexual situations)
Running Time:  120 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     No previous adaptation of an Elmore Leonard novel -- and there have
been a couple of pretty good ones recently in GET SHORTY and JACKIE BROWN
-- has captured the author's unique flavor as effectively as OUT OF SIGHT.
Though Leonard usually writes about criminal characters, he doesn't
exactly write crime novels; though his stories are often quite funny, he
doesn't exactly write comic novels; though his narratives always come
together in a way that makes sense, he doesn't exactly let tight plotting
get in the way of an amusing tangent.  Leonard is his own literary animal:
sometimes sordid, sometimes smirking, always sly.
     You'll find every one of those contradictions and then some in OUT OF
SIGHT, a marvelously meandering caper with rhythms all its own.  The story
focuses on the aftermath of the Florida prison escape of career bank
robber Jack Foley (George Clooney).  In the wrong place at the right time
is U. S. marshal Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez), who ends up sharing a
cramped trunk ride with Jack when his friend Buddy (Ving Rhames)
commandeers Karen's car for the escape.  Surprisingly, the ride proves
intriguing to both parties.  Karen manages to free herself and gets on the
case of re-apprehending Jack, though she isn't sure whether she wants him
for business or pleasure.  Jack, meanwhile, prepares for his next big
score, though he isn't sure whether he's more interested in scoring cash
or Karen.
     OUT OF SIGHT certainly works best as a quirky comedy, with
screenwriter Scott Frank (who also adapted GET SHORTY) providing great
material for a superb supporting cast.  Steve Zahn steals every one of his
scenes as Jack and Buddy's perpetually stoned accomplice Glenn, channeling
Crispin Glover with considerably more appealing goofiness.  Also on hand
are Albert Brooks as the white collar crook whose home is our heroes' next
target, Don Cheadle as edgy partner-in-crime Maurice "Snoopy" Miller, and
Dennis Farina as Karen's protective father.  There are even a couple of
sharp unbilled cameos, including Michael Keaton reprising his JACKIE BROWN
character and a final-scene appearance by another veteran of a previous
Leonard adaptation.  Good scripts make even mediocre actors look better;
Frank's script in the hands of these actors is a hilarious gem.
     But OUT OF SIGHT isn't just a comedy.  It's also a love story, if a
very odd one.  The relationship between Jack and Karen is the heart of the
film, a dangerous set-up since the two characters share exactly two scenes
for all practical purposes.  Both scenes, however, are perfectly executed:
the trunk-trapped initial conversation (photographed by Elliot Davis in
seductive tail-light red), and a meeting in a hotel bar which fluidly
shifts to a closer encounter.  Clooney has never looked more comfortable
or charismatic on the big screen, nor has Lopez, for that matter.  With a
clever nod to the fast-attraction nature of film romances (in a reference
to the Redford-Dunaway thriller THREE DAYS OF THE CONDOR), OUT OF SIGHT
gets maximum mileage out of the pairing of its stars in a believable
fast-attraction film romance.
     There are also plenty of crime caper elements mixed in with the
comedy and romance, including no small amount of bloodshed, but even then
the film seems entirely cohesive.  Credit director Steven Soderbergh with
crafting a distinctive, unifying look and feel from Frank's deftly
back-tracking script.  Most frequently he employs an abrupt freeze-framing
device, usually to mark transitions between scenes and locations.  In
Soderbergh's capable hands the freeze-frames never feel gimmicky, instead
playing as chapter stops on Leonard's snappy punch lines.  There's nothing
particularly deep or intensely memorable about OUT OF SIGHT -- indeed, the
pace flags a bit at times as it tries to keep up with all its characters 
-- but it's the kind of film that punches holes in the notion that
"entertaining" and "smart" are mutually exclusive adjectives for a summer
film.  This is pure pulp pleasure, the cinematic equivalent of great beach
reading... and what better way is there to describe the work of Elmore
Leonard?

Author
DeWyNGaLe
George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, and Steve Zhan star in the comedy
about a bank robber.  George Clooney stars as Jack Foley, a professional bank
robber.  He has robbed over 200 banks in his time.  He has been caught a few
times, and he has been sent to jail a few times.  One night at the jail, he and
a couple of buddies plan an escape from the jail.  Ving Rhames plays Buddy, the
man who has a car waiting for Jack and the other two escaping with him.  Buddy
isn't the only one waiting for Jack and company that night.  Federal Marshall
Karen Sisco, played by Jennifer Lopez, is there ready to make the bust.  Jack
makes it out of the jail, but the other two are shot dead.  Buddy and Jack
shove Karen into the trunk of the car to make sure she doesn't make the bust. 
Jack stays in the trunk with her, and they discuss many things, including life
and movies.
At a gas station, they see Glenn, an old pal, played by Steve Zhan.  They put
Glenn in the car also, so no information gets out.  Jack and Buddy step out of
the car to discuss the plan on what they are going to do, and while this
happens, Karen persuades Glenn to drive away, getting away from Jack and Buddy.
 Now, Jack and Buddy must find Glenn, and Karen must find Jack and Buddy. 
Karen asks Jack's ex-wife about where Jack may be, and doesn't find out much
information there.  
Karen sees Jack around as she looks for him, and doesn't do anything, acts like
he isn't there.  When they do meet up, they talk, and she doesn't try to arrest
him or anything.  She discovers that she is in love with the man she has to
take to jail.  He loves her to, and doesn't want to hurt her.
Karen also has to find Glenn now as well.  She remembers him saying he was
going to Detroit, so she suspects she might find Glenn, as well as Jack and
Buddy there.  At a boxing match, she catches Glenn trying to steal a car from
the parking lot.  She lets him go, because she has better things to do than to
make a bust.  She learns from Glenn that the plan is to go to Richard Ripley's
house, played by Albert Brooks.  Ripley has five point two million dollars
worth of uncut diamonds, and everyone is after them.  Little does Glenn know
that Jack, Buddy, and the others they met up with, changed the plan to stealing
the diamonds that same night, so Glenn wouldn't tell anyone.
Jack, Buddy, and the others go to Ripley's house to get the uncut diamonds. 
The maid answers the door, and the four of them bust into the house.  Little do
they know that Karen is sitting outside ready to make a bust.  Jack finds the
diamonds on his own, and gives them to Buddy to drive off with.  The others
with Jack assume that Jack and Buddy are trying to rip them off, but they
aren't.  Snoopy, (one of the others with them), played by Don Cheadle and Jack
get in a fight, but Karen ends it by entering the house and shooting Snoopy
dead.  She doesn't want to hurt Jack, because they are in love.  The ending is
also surprising and well done.
Out Of Sight is a cheaply made film, but price doesn't mean anything.  Out Of
Sight is without a doubt one of the best, most original films of 1998.  All of
the acting was done wonderfully, the plot was developed, and the setting was
great and realistic.  George Clooney and Jennifer Lopez do outstanding jobs as
their characters, and they make you believe that they are real people.  Samuel
L. Jackson and Michael Keaton also make short cameos in which they do a good
job of acting in.  I wish that more people would see Out Of Sight, because of
how good it was.  It was a little confusing at times, but that doesn't make
much of a difference when you have such a great film.  All in all, Out Of
Sight, is definitely out of sight. 

Author
Michael Dequina
Chemistry between romantic leads can make or break a film, and never in
recent memory has it more "made" a film than in Steven Soderbergh's witty,
slick, sexy adaptation of Elmore Leonard's novel.  _Out_of_Sight_ jumps
back and forth in time to tell the twisting tale of suave bank robber Jack
Foley (George Clooney, rebounding well after his disastrous turn as the
Caped Crusader), out to make one big score after escaping from prison; hot
on his trail--and hot _for_ him--is tough U.S. Marshal Karen Sisco (the
ever-sultry Jennifer Lopez), who falls hard for Jack's charms after being
briefly locked in a trunk with him during his prison break.
Although _Out_of_Sight_'s intricately structured plot requires the
audience's undivided attention, Soderbergh and screenwriter Scott Frank
(who also adapted Leonard's _Get_Shorty_) are less concerned with story
than they are dialogue and the quirky characters that deliver it, and the
film offers a wide array of memorable personalities, such as Jack's
collaborators in the planned big heist: stoner Glenn (Steve Zahn); the
menacing Maurice, a.k.a. Snoopy (Don Cheadle); his clumsy bodyguard White
Boy Bob (Keith Loneker); and Jack's partner Buddy (Ving Rhames).  Most
memorable of all, though, is the central duo of Jack and Karen, who are
both acutely aware of the danger of their mutual attraction yet are
completely powerless to resist the thrill.  The impossibly glamorous and
charismatic pair of Clooney and Lopez absolutely sizzle from their first
moment together; the soulful, smoldering gazes they lay upon each other are
sexier than any explicit scene could ever be.  It is their effortless
rapport that carries the film and jumpstarts its sometimes-flagging energy.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Cast: George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Dennis Farina, Don
Cheadle, Albert Brooks, Steve Zahn, Catherine Keener
Director: Steven Soderbergh
Screenplay: Scott Frank based on the novel by Elmore Leonard
Australian theatrical release date:  October 15, 1998
Elmore Leonard novels have made some great material for films, and great
films they have been.  The best thing about this writer is that he
constantly surprises his audience, unraveling hidden talents in his
writing which exceed most expectations set by less witty writers.  Just
when we thought he could only create only intriguing character (in Get
Shorty), he introduced a wide spectrum of appealing characters in Jackie
Brown.   And just when it appeared as if a punchy romance was not
included in the package, Out of Sight poses a dynamic sexual chemistry
between its two protagonists.
The screenplay, adapted by Scott Frank (who also did Get Shorty),
revolves around Jack Foley (George Clooney), a 40-year-old bank robber
who charms his victims into co-operating. In a failed getaway, Foley
faces 30 years of jail time and plots to break out of prison, with the
assistance of his best friend Buddy (Ving Rhames, from Mission:
Impossible and Pulp Fiction).  Foxy Federal Marshal Karen Sisco
(Jennifer Lopez) gets stuck in the middle of a break out attempt, and
ends up sharing time in a car boot with Foley.  Foley ponders over what
would have been had they met under different circumstances, but Karen
seems reluctant to reveal her true feelings.  Both fall in love, aware
of the impossibility of their relationship.  Meanwhile, Foley and Buddy
plan to rip off a former inmate, the billionaire Richard Ripley (Albert
Brooks), who has a stash of uncut diamonds hidden somewhere in his
mansion.
The casting of George Clooney was ingenious.  He oozes charisma and
sincerity, but is careful not to let his character reduce to pulp.  Out
of Sight is one of Clooney's few good movies and his best role choice;
putting on the black cape in Batman and Robin was a pretty stupid
mistake, but not after making a couple of others with One Fine Day and
The Peacemaker.  It's good to see that George has found stable cinematic
ground with this film, and hopefully he will be able to keep it up with
his next picture The Thin Red Line, an adaptation of James Jones'
autobiographical 1962 novel, focusing on the conflict at Guadalcanal
during the second World War.
Jennifer Lopez is also terrific in this film, looking irresistible as
the foxy Federal Marshall.  She plays her part by the book and with
little originality, but she is strong, and her character is written so
well that Lopez's performance seems better than it actually is.
Together, Clooney and Lopez create some of Out of Sight's most memorable
scenes, including the previously mentioned, and very dialogue rich,
scene in a boot of a car and an explosive sexual encounter (without
showcasing any sex at all).
Somehow, even amongst all of Elmore Leonard's slick criminals and
stylish dialogue, I am still not sure of how far he could take his
writing.  Even though Jackie Brown has been one of this year's best
films and Get Shorty was an extraordinary and enjoyable piece, no films
of yet have been able to fully capture the spirit of Leonard's writing.
Jackie Brown has probably come the closest, perhaps due to its direction
by Quentin Tarantino, a man who is equally as stylish and eccentric.  If
you take into account all that director Steven Soderbergh (sex, lies and
videotape) has included in Out of Sight, there's a whole lot that he has
missed out on.  The absence of interesting bad guys, for example, since
all the ones in this film are idiots (illustrated in one scene when they
all shoot at a safe and bullets rebound everywhere, just for the maid to
give them the combination without them even asking, and then discovering
that the safe contains hair wigs).
The screenplay is interesting because it unfolds a straight forward
narrative in a complex way, with flash backs and flash forwards, and
repeated scenes, so later the audience can breathe a sigh of relief and
say, "oh, that's what happened."  Scott Frank seems desperate to throw
in as much of Leonard's writing as he possibly can, and as a consequence
some scenes are drawn out way too long, and a few are slightly too
short.  The punchy romance is often pushed aside, and less interesting
characters (primarily the bad guys) are given too much screen time.
For all its faults, Out of Sight still remains a well-written piece with
witty black comedy, punchy dialogue and amazingly effective sexual
chemistry.  There are also a couple of amusing cameos from Michael
Keaton and Samuel L. Jackson thrown in for good measure. Now it's just a
matter of waiting to see what Elmore Leonard comes up with next.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.for any
inquiries or feedback

Author
Andrew Hicks
        Hollywood has a .750 batting average with Elmore Leonard adaptations.
Last year's TOUCH was ill-conceived and just plain odd but GET SHORTY, 
JACKIE BROWN and now OUT OF SIGHT all were highly entertaining movies.
Steven Soderburgh, master of sex, lies and videotape, now adds crime to
his repertoire in this tale of bank robbery, prison, double-crossing,
uncut diamonds and, oh yeah, true love. 
        George Clooney is the protagonist, a risky choice after such duds as
BATMAN AND ROBIN and THE PEACEMAKER, but for once I didn't want to slap
the taste out of his mouth. He plays his role in OUT OF SIGHT as the suave
Cary Grant-type perfected in Hitchcock movies, the kind of guy to whom
crime is just a profession like any other. Nowhere present is Clooney's
usual ain't-I-sexy sneer -- there's just enough leftover lightheartedness
to fit in with the Leonard style. Clooney is definitely a perfect
successor to John Travolta in GET SHORTY. 
        Clooney plays a man who's robbed about 200 banks without ever
using a gun. In the opening scene, he walks into one bank and robs it not
only with ease but with charm. Of course, he gets caught, so it's not all
good. It's while doing time in a Florida prison that Clooney learns of one
rich inmate's (Albert Brooks in a frightful bald wig) collection of
diamonds in Detroit. Clooney and cohort Ving Rhames plan the score, while
protection artist and fight promoter Don Cheadle begins rival plans. 
        Meanwhile, there's Jennifer Lopez. Unintentionally funny in SELENA
and intentionally funny in ANACONDA, she's finally graduated to a worthy
role as the U.S. marshal who happens to be driving up to the jail on the
night Clooney escapes. Rhames is waiting to give him a ride in a stolen
car, and Lopez makes it a threesome, her hostage ass locked in a trunk
with Clooney. He's covered in dirt and has a gun to her neck, and it's a
little cramped in there, but they manage to make a love connection
anyway, probably because it's a movie. 
        The relationship between Clooney and Lopez is at the heart of the
movie, and one of the details that elevates it beyond your normal noir-ish
crime story. The Leonard movies are more obsessed with dialogue than
crime, and this is no exception. Although they're not really germane to
the plot, Lopez's relationship with her father (Dennis Farina of GET
SHORTY), Rhames' relationship with his Christian sister (you could call
her Sister Christian) and a pop-in cameo by Michael Keaton all lend extra
class to a movie already full of it. 
        OUT OF SIGHT spans at least three years but has a non-linear
structure, focusing on the jailbreak / Brooks score and flashing back to
earlier times. This is a movie with a brain, as smooth and calculated as
the Clooney and Lopez characters themselves. The entire cast does the
material justice -- Clooney and Lopez coming into their own, and Rhames
and Cheadle cementing their positions as two of my favorites. Here's
hoping future Leonard adaptations continue to carry the torch. 
Address responses to c667778@showme.missouri.edu
Visit my homepage at http://students.missouri.edu/~ahicks/movies.html
More than 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair.
Serving America for almost 1/20th of a century!

Author
Murali Krishnan
Bank robber Jack Foley is a career criminal, but he's not a bad guy. As he
is escaping from prison, he is forced to kidnap federal marshal Karen Sisco
when she stumbles upon Jack emerging from a tunnel. Although she manages to
escape from Foley and his accomplices, they both remain obsessed with each
other. Foley eventually meets with some fellow ex-convicts in a planned
robbery of a swindler who has a fortune in uncut diamonds hidden in his
mansion. However, Sisco is on a crusade to find Foley, with or without the
FBI, and she is closing in on him.
I had high expectations for the film since it was directed by Steven
Soderbergh, but I was disappointed. It was not necessarily the direction
that was weak, but the story had too much shallowness that no amount of
direction could patch. This seemed to be a departure for Soderbergh in that
this is a traditional Hollywood film, whereas he is usually helming more
independent projects.
The basic premise of the story, the improbable attraction between the career
criminal and the law enforcement agent, was just that -- too improbable. It
is not that such romances are impossible, but rather that it was portrayed
as love at first sight (or rather, love at first kidnap), and there was no
apparent basis for their chemistry. Of course, Foley is portrayed as
likable. He never does anything distasteful, and even his crimes are
portrayed as victimless. Although this was meant to make him attractive, it
made him unbelievable.
Another major problem is a lingering lack of tension. From an early point,
we know where the story is going to go, and the film takes forever to get
there. Adding in the fact that antagonists are sociopathic thugs that
viewers are forced to hate underscores the blandness of the film. An
interesting directorial flourish is the fact that the scenes of the story
are not always presented in chronological order. The challenge of
determining the proper sequence was really the only enjoyable part of the
film for me.
Marginally Recommended. It may appeal to some viewers. It did not to me.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Berge Garabedian
Steven Soderbergh takes a shot at another one of Elmore Leonard's
famous crime novels. He follows the recent footsteps of Quentin
Tarantino with JACKIE BROWN (6.5/10) based on Leonard's "Rum Punch",
Paul Shrader's TOUCH (5/10) and Barry Sonnenfeld's GET SHORTY (7.5/10).
Soderbergh is best known for his award-winning debut film SEX, LIES AND
VIDEOTAPE (Winner of the Palme D'or at the 1989 Cannes Film Festival.)
Since then, he hasn't done anything of great interest.
PLOT:
Extreme bank-robber Foley falls into another caper with partner Buddy,
and a host of other lowlifes after his recent stint in the big house.
During his escapades, he meets US Marshal Sisco, who takes a liking to
this con man, who in turn, falls for the luscious government agent. 
CRITIQUE:
Great crime picture, with interesting performances, unique style and an
intertwining, captivating plot. This movie comes closest to PULP
FICTION (7.5/10) in its style and feel, and definitely delivers on the
appeal elements more successfully than Tarantino's
over-character-developed film JACKIE BROWN. Mind you, this movie does
lack the hipper-than-thou dialogue that was sprinkled throughout PULP
FICTION, but even still, it manages to pull off a great addition to the
crime genre. It's got its thrilling moments, its funny moments, and
even its sexy moments. Like PULP FICTION, the plot goes back and forth
through time, but it is never confusing, and never gets in the way of
the interesting crime-ridden plot line.
The characters are real, or at least feel real, and the developing
relationship between the two leading antagonistic characters is
well-done and believable. Soderbergh's shooting style is slick, and
reminiscent of some of the best '70's exploitation movies, as well as
the soundtrack which comes through like the era left behind, but the
sounds not forgotten. All of the stars are great in their roles, with
exceptional marks to Clooney (who's finally beginning to "act") and
Lopez, who comes through in sexy gangbusters! Also, both stars are
extremely "easy on the eyes", with a tip of the hat to Clooney for
getting in such excellent shape for this flick (my brother noted that
you could bounce a quarter off his well-developed six-pack stomach).
Also, Jennifer Lopez is both sexy and gorgeous. But did I mention that
already? 
On the down side, I did find the film to be a little too long on its
running time, but that's about all that I could say on that in regards
to negativity. Add to that, the superior cinematography of the film,
especially during the winter shots in Detroit which were particularly
well-shot, and you've got yourself a great story, told in an original
manner, with two great-looking and interesting leading characters, and
a plot that always keeps you guessing. Top that off with a couple of
cool cameos, and a slick directorial style, and you've got yourself a
nacho-munching cinematic extravaganza for the summer. 
Little Known Facts: 
Three stars from PULP FICTION also show up in this film.
Michael Keaton's character from JACKIE BROWN makes an appearance in
this film as the same character  he played in the former.
Soderbergh wrote the screenplay to NIGHTWATCH, and also had a hand in
the written form of MIMIC (6.5/10).
Jennifer Lopez was one of the "Fly girls" dancers on the "In Living
Color" TV Show. At the movie wrap party for SELENA, on Oct. 28 1996 in
San Antonio, Jennifer's boyfriend Ojani Noa grabbed a microphone and
proposed to her in the middle of the dance floor, presenting her with a
large marquis-cut diamond ring. She said 'yes'.
Nancy Allen of "Brian DePalma's wife for four years" fame, and star of
DePalma's BLOW OUT (7/10) and DRESSED TO KILL (7/10), plays Midge in
this film.
Screenwriter Scott Frank also wrote the screenplay to GET SHORTY,
another one of Elmore Leonard's novels.


Author
Mark R. Leeper
     This is the season for "good guy" bank robbers.  Earlier this year
we had THE NEWTON BOYS about the most successful bank robbers in
American history, but who remained nice guys through it all.  Perhaps
inspired by them is Jack Foley (George Clooney) who has robbed more
than 200 banks without anyone ever being hurt.  That record is almost
believable as the film opens with Foley using his charm and a clever
plot to rob one more bank.  This time his luck is against him and he is
caught and thrown into prison.  Nor do the breaks come his way when he
tries to escape from prison.  Just as he has tunneled out, gun-loving
federal marshal Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez) is there by chance.  Foley
and company have to take shotgun from her and kidnap her, throwing her
in the same trunk in which Foley will hide.  Even under the
circumstances there is chemistry between them, and even after she
escapes, each continues to think about the other.  This could be bad
for either of them since professionally they are opponents.
     George Clooney is sort of a bland actor who floats along on his
good looks.  I have yet to see him show anything akin to emotional
intensity in a role.  And because his characters are not stressed, we
never see what they are made of.  That gives him a nice sturdy screen
persona, but it is not going to win him any acting awards.  Clooney
glides through Jack Foley effortlessly and leaving behind little
memorable but his smile.  Jennifer Lopez's Karen Sisco is only a little
more interesting.  She is more of a prime mover in the story, but as is
much to frequently the case in 90s popular films, the main characters
more have to look good than to create memorable characters.  More
interesting roles went to Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle, Albert Brooks, and
especially Dennis Farina.  Watch for two major actors who have cameo
roles.
     Scott Frank's screenplay is deliberately non-linear and a little
confusing, jumping without warning into or out of flashbacks.  Perhaps
this is even a good thing since the story itself is fairly
straightforward.  The solution to the puzzle may be simple, but there
is enough spin on the ball when the story is told to make the viewer
feel good when the pieces fit together.  When the film starts we have
several seemingly disconnected strands of plot with different
characters, but the strands are quickly brought together.  Some of the
photographic touches are a little obvious.  Scenes that take place
under the warm Florida sun are shot with bright colors, but scenes that
take place in Detroit are shot mostly with a blue filter to give them a
sort of run-down look.  The dialog is humorous, but a little more
down-to-earth than Quentin Tarantino might offer.  But then Elmore
Leonard has his own strange touch when it come to dialog.  There is
little actual sex in the film that the audience sees--two characters
undress in front of each other, but we see little we could not see on
the beach.  The conclusion of the film, on the other hand, is fairly
gory and we do see the blood.
     OUT OF SIGHT is not one of the great crime films, but it is
entertainment with a little challenge to the audience.  It does not
push the outside of the envelope, but it gets its job done.  I give it
a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Brian Gross
Directed - Steven Soderbergh
Starring - George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, 
Don Cheadle, Dennis Farina, Albert Brooks
Screenplay - Scott Frank, Elmore Leonard (novel)
 Music - David Holmes
One of the marks of postmodern film is fragmentation; style,
visualization, writing direction, et cetera.  Very often that spills
over in the advertising for a movie and leaves surface moviegoers in
for a shock (see Boogie Nights for example; the ads are like hip Brady
Bunch episodes but the film is about the hardcore porn industry).  Out
of Sight sets itself apart with a convincing ad campaign that kept
with the feel of the movie and brought to mind the French New Wave and
European films of the '70s.
Steven Soderbergh - no stranger to textured European elements in
cinema - takes on Elmore Leonard's novel and brings it to a cohesive
whole on the screen.  He blends the talent effectively; from his nod
to François Truffaut's Jules and Jim by using stop-camera photography,
to choosing a good writer to handle the screenplay, to coaxing good
performances out of all the key players throughout.
Jack Foley (George Clooney) is a good thief.  He's done time in the
joint, he's street smart and always has a plan.  Two years before the
present story began he was in a Lompoc prison with his best friend
Buddy and the hapless felon Glenn.  One day Richard (Albert Brooks), a
wealthy prisoner, tells Glenn that he has two million dollars in
diamonds stashed in his house.  At the same prison is a fighter named
Snoopy (Don Cheadle) who is leaning on Richard to get some dough.
Eventually they are all released and Jack, after trying to hit Richard
up for a cozy job, promptly robs a bank that gets him thrown in a
prison in the Everglades.  Following the lead of two bumbling escapees
he escapes and is met outside the prison gates by Buddy, but also
there for an appointment is FBI agent Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez, in
a trademark Leonard role of the fiesty and profane female).
They nab her and load Jack in the trunk of her car with her.  He gets
to know Karen pretty well in their twenty-minute ride but as their
rendezvous is with Glenn, something goes foul.  It seems as when Jack
and Buddy were talking outside the car Karen convinces the loaded
Glenn to leave with the getaway car and avoid being an accessory to a
crime.  Jack and Buddy scram but they later learn that Glenn has had
an accident that landed Karen in the hospital.  She wants to see Jack
again and he certainly wants to see her.
Buddy has a problem with this though, as every time he commits a sin
he calls his sister, who works for an evangelist, and confesses
everything he has done to her.  So Jack and Buddy head off for
Richard's home in Detroit.  Karen follows under the guise of the
manhunt in the Everglades.  It seems that Snoopy has set up a boxing
rink in Detroit and has his eyes on the money as well;  the naďve
Glenn had given Snoopy a heads-up on the deal and shows up to do the
job.
Eventually Karen and Jack hook up and have a night of passion, both
too selfish to give up what they love; Karen for enforcing the law and
for Jack, breaking it.  The climax is set as Snoopy, his thugs, Jack,
and Buddy go to Richard's house.  There is no love lost between any of
these men and the only trust is between Buddy and Jack.  The diamonds
are found but the nexus comes when Karen confronts Jack in his vice
and demands his surrender.  Whether you like or dislike the ending of
puffery I found it a fun ride with an excellent ensemble performance.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Imagine the sexy Jennifer Lopez almost bursting out of her
expensive suit and you nestled up right next to her.  To sweeten this
dream sequence conjure up this vision with the two of you stuck close
together in the confines of an automobile trunk speeding down the
highway.  That's just the wonderful predicament that George Clooney
finds himself in the midst of in OUT OF SIGHT.
     (Female readers can recast the entire first paragraph to have
Lopez being the lucky one since Clooney with his new full flowing
hairstyle is Lopez's equal when it comes to sensual good looks.)
     Elmore Leonard novels normally feature the quirky low-lifes of the
criminal world, along with their just as unusual police pursuers.  Of
the many pictures made from his books, the most recent three are GET
SHORTY, TOUCH, and JACKIE BROWN, this one is arguably the best.  The
first big budget picture by director Steven Soderbergh of SEX, LIES,
AND VIDEOTAPE fame demonstrates his dedication to character development
over plot.
     As richly textured as a Brueghel painting, the story meanders
along giving the players adequate, sometimes more than adequate, time
and space to develop their characters.
     Scott Frank's screenplay skips backwards and forwards in time with
great glee, which makes paying attention important.  The effect of this
fairly random method of storytelling is to add layers and dimensions
that a straightforward rendition would miss.
     The plot has Jennifer Lopez playing a smart, tough and voluptuous
FBI agent named Karen Sisco.  Luckily for her (and him), she witnesses
a prison break during which she is captured by a handsome, middle-aged
bank robber named Jack Foley, played suavely by George Clooney.  It is
in the trunk on the way out that they begin to sense the physical
attraction they have for each other.
     Soderbergh saves the consummation of their relationship for much
later in the film.  When it does happen, against the lush backdrop of a
Detroit snowfall, he concentrates on the tension up to the time they
take their clothes off rather than after, which is never shown.  Their
flirting at the cocktail lounge beforehand and their partial disrobing
in the hotel bedroom is more erotic than many more explicit scenes
found in other films.  Soderbergh realizes that it is the anticipation
of the affair that is frequently as satisfying, if not more so, than
the tryst itself.
     Between the prison break and the lover's assignation is a long
cat-and-mouse game in which Karen tags along with the FBI team looking
for Foley and the other escapees.  Her motivation for locating him is
rather dubious.
     Along the way we meet a string of curious characters.  Ving Rhames
plays Buddy Bragg, Foley's sidekick, who feels obligated to have many
long phone calls with his religious sister so he can confess his sins.
When he once made the mistake of baring his soul before the crime, she
called the cops.
     An almost unrecognizable Albert Brooks plays a prisoner named
Richard Ripley, who is patterned after Michael Milken.  Only Brooks's
voice gives his identity away during the prison sequences.
     Steve Zahn is the ever-stoned Glenn Michaels.  Wearing a series of
sunglasses, he is every con's worst nightmare for a partner.
     Audience's enjoyment of the picture will depend in part on their
ability to derive satisfaction from such a cornucopia of corny
characters.  Thanks especially to the hot chemistry between the two
leads, the picture will delight most viewers even while the lack of
much narrative drive may frustrate them.  There are worse things to do
than hang out with the likes of Jennifer Lopez and George Clooney for
two hours.
     OUT OF SIGHT runs 2:02.  It is rated R for violence, profanity,
and sexual situations and would be fine for most teenagers.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Universal Pictures
 Director: Steven Soderbergh
 Writer: Scott Frank, novel by Elmore Leonard
 Cast: George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Don
Cheadle, Dennis Farina, Albert Brooks
   At the beginning of a 10-round prizefight, two
contenders come out and touch gloves as a sign that they
don't really mean each other harm: it's just part of the game. 
Then they pummel each other as though to belie their act of
camaraderie.  By the end of round 5, one guy's eye is virtually
closed, the other is bleeding from the nose.  The crowd
cheers.  What would happen if, before coming out for the
sixth round, each fighter called a half-hour time out and both
existed for the nearest luncheonette for a cappuccino and a
chat? "How's your little baby doing?" says one, while the other
responds, "Is your mother OK after her surgery?"  Would they
still have the same fight in them when they returned to the
ring?  Hardly.
   This is the premise of "Out of Sight," a crime story mined
by novelist Elmore Leonard--also known for "Get Shorty"--for
comic resonance.  It's a metaphoric boxing match between a
charming bank robber and a beautiful federal marshall who is
chasing him and rounds up getting pursued instead.  He, Jack
Foley (George Clooney), has just broken out of prison where
he is serving a thirty-year sentence; she, Karen Sisco, is a
federal cop who can get a jump on her career by bringing him
in but is hindered by her romantic feeling for him.  As the
novelist states, "Like if she were to make a T with her two
hands, calling for a time-out....It would be okay then to say hi,
how're you doing?  They stand there talking, polite to each
other.  He might say something about her shooting at him and
she'd say heah, well, you know....You have time for a
drink?...The next time she saw him, she'd cuff his hands
behind his back and take him in."
   Director Steven Soderbergh, known for spare statements as
in his celebrated "...sex, lies, and videotape," and for the dry
humor of that great monologue, "Gray's Anatomy," helms
against type by finding a broadly comic tone in this movie
version of "Out of Sight."  Filmed in bold color by veteran
Soderbergh cinematographer Elliot Davis, the film comes right
to the point by opening without credits on a bank robbery that
that is so smooth and confident that you need not wonder that
the perp is a veteran of 200 such escapades.  Caught when
his car would not start, he is given a 30-year jail sentence as
a incorrigible criminal, then manages to break out--but not
without interference from federal marshall Karen Sisco
(Jennifer Lopez), who happens to be on the scene.  Sisco is
overpowered and, in the key scene, is tossed into the trunk of
a getaway car together with Foley.  Their conversation
proceeds like anyone's dream first-date, leading to instant
Stockholm syndrome.  The two are in love, an unlikely pairing
which provides much of the comic impact of this delightful
caper movie.
   A good deal of the story is centered on the way both Foley
and Sisco live in anticipation of their next meeting.  As with
any good romance film,  a great deal is put in the way of their
getting together, not the least being that she is obligated to
bring Foley in while he needs both to avoid her and to
consummate his attraction.  Soderbergh films with striking
hyperrealism in one scene, as Foley and Sisco get together
for a romantic interlude in a dazzling night club and, as they
converse they fantasy the inevitable conclusion to the
evening's dalliance.  Soderbergh also makes Elmore
Leonard's novel cinematic by use of flashbacks, frequently
dashing from some of Anne V. Coates's briskly edited scenes
to incidents involving Foley's stay in the Florida prison.
   For George Clooney and Jennifer Lopez, "Out of Sight"
stands as their best work.  Clooney has lost his signature
cocked-head, smiling mannerisms while Lopez, who
substitutes for the blond agent of the book, conveys her
conflict with every move.  In the convincing and jocose side
roles, Dennis Farina portrays Karen's understanding dad,
Steve Zahn a drug addict who talks too much, Albert Brooks a
multimillionaire jailed for insider trading who confides too
readily in his jailmates, and best of all Ving Rhames as
Buddy, famous for confessing his crimes to his sister who
promptly turns him in each time.  Gary Frutkoff's production
design dazzles, particularly in his conception of a night club
on a snowy night that makes Detroit look like Davos.

Author
James Brundage
Directed by Steven Soderburgh (Sex, Lies, and Videotape)
Starring George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Dennis Farina, and Ving Rhames
 This would be a movie for thanksgiving, because, after seeing Steven
Soderburgh's Elmore Leonard adaptation Out of Sight, I'm read to give
thanks.  I'd like to give thanks that Hollywood is still capable of turning
out a decent character, even if it is based on a book.  I'd like to give
thanks that George Clooney finally lifted his eyes off the ground and looked
into the camera for once.  And I'd really like to give thanks that I saw Out
of Sight, which has more fun than I've gotten from a film since December.
 Out of Sight, a movie that I planned to see in theatres but just got around
to, is one of the funniest crime films I've ever seen, hilarious to the same
point as Get Shorty (another Elmore Leonard adaptation by Scott Frank).  It'
s out of control yet well-plotted, overtly quick yet well paced.  It mixes
and matches story with sentimentality, which, as anyone who hears my daily
gripe about cinema knows, is a rare thing.
 The plot of Out of Sight is as wacky as Get Shorty: The worlds most
prolific bank robber Jack Foley (Clooney) escapes from a Florida prison,
kidnapping a Federal Marshall, Karen (Lopez), while he's at it.  Hiding in
the back truck on Karen's car while a friend (Ving Rhames) drives them to a
second car, they talk about  movies?  An immediate romantic connection is
formed, and we are given a window into a very unique love story.  One half
of Clooney is planning his big score, another half trying to seduce Lopez
while not being arrested by her.
 Although not as complex of a story as Get Shorty was, the tale of Jack
Foley is equally unique and satiric.  Each Elmore Leonard adaptation seems
both vastly different and interestingly the same.  All of them have
criminals as the main characters, all of them have one person so ahead of
the game that you have to try to catch up, yet each of them features a
different satiric target.  Get Shorty picked on Hollywood.  Touch took on
organized religion.  Jackie Brown (based on `Rum Punch') made fun of the
entire game of cops-and-robbers by being two steps ahead.  Out of Sight
takes on your basic romance story with a great twist.
 It opens with one of the smartest bank robberies in cinema history: Jack
walks into a bank, no gun, no weapon, smiles at the teller and informs her
that a partner ahs a gun and is ready to shoot her boss in between the eyes
if she doesn't cooperate.  Of course, it's all a bluff, but Jack charms his
way through a bank robbery unarmed only to have it all screwed up when the
car won't start.
 As I said, I am very thankful that George Clooney didn't blunder over
himself by looking at the ground.  It would have ruined the entire movie if
he acted bashful, which he seems to do without trying, but the man pulls off
a decent performance.  I'm not saying he should get any awards, but it's a
lot better than he normally does.  Jennifer Lopez does likewise, not acting
as helpless as she normally does.  Instead, she gives Karen a unique charm
about her.
 Steven Soderburgh, who first burst onto the scene nine years ago with Sex,
Lies, and Videotape, which really started the second independent revolution
going and jump-started the Sundance film festival, takes the helm of the
studio project that, with Hollywood as it is today, might have ended up a
formula piece were it not for his unique touch.  He does a masterful job of
editing his film, taking the sex scene and having a conversation intercut
and voice-overed.  Although, unlike Get Shorty and Jackie Brown, which had a
flair towards the stedicam and thus towards movement of the camera in
general, you don't get much in the way of that.  The most you'll get besides
the cuts are the occasional pan.  But, hey, Soderburgh pulled his
masterpiece Sex, Lies, and Videotape off hardly moving the camera at all.
 In the end Out of Sight is a pleasing movie on all levels.  Soderburgh
makes it eye candy, writer Scott Frank makes it ear candy, and Lopez and
Clooney make it a plain delight to view.  Definitely worth renting, and, if
any serious competition would come to the Scott B. Smith monopoly on the
Best Adapted Screenplay, this would be it.

Author
Matt Williams
Elmore Leonard has quickly become one of Hollywood's favorite authors.
Out of four film adaptations in as many years, the witty and inventive
Out of Sight gives Get Shorty a run for its money as the best Leonard
adaptation around.
George Clooney stars as Jack Foley, a nice bank robber...you know the
type, he uses his charm and his wits rather than a gun.  But even
charming guys end up unlucky, and Jack ends up in jail.  But not for
long.  He plots an escape with the help of his best friend, and fellow
robber, Buddy Bragg (Ving Rhames), and their slow-witted pothead
associate, Glenn Michaels (Steve Zahn).
But Jack didn't count on U.S. Marshal Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez).
Appearing at the right place at the wrong time, Karen gets involved in
Foley's escape attempt and the subsequent manhunt to bring him in.
However, Karen develops a rapport with Jack Foley, and finds that she
begrudgingly likes the guy. But, can love prosper on opposite sides of
the law?  Or can Karen straighten out Jack before he goes too far in
pursuit of just one last crime.
Clooney, who has had a string of solid, but never stellar, film roles,
delivers his best performance to date.  He blends into his role here
perfectly as the risk taking Jack Foley, who's willing to gamble
everything on the chance that Karen Sisco might be his true love.
Jennifer Lopez does an excellent job as well.  She actually has a
trickier role than Clooney, as a woman who has to balance her emotions
with her sense of duty.  She and Clooney develop good chemistry
together.
The film boasts a superb ensemble.  Steve Zahn gives a hilarious
performance, and steals nearly every scene he's in.  Don Cheadle is
appropriately sinister as a violent ex-con who may or may not be teaming
up with Foley.  Albert Brooks is enjoyable as a white collar criminal
who talks too much for his own good.  Out of the cast, only Dennis
Farina seems underused as Karen's ex-lawman father.
Steven Soderbergh gives the film sharp and stylistic direction.  With an
affectation for freeze frames, he delivers a unique take on the film's
action and love scenes that places Out of Sight a notch above routine
crime films.
A recurring series of flashbacks makes the film seem more complex than
it actually is.  Devoid of its bells and whistles, Out of Sight is
actually a fairly straightforward crime story.  However, there are only
a few spots in the film that seem bare, and they pass quickly.
With smart dialogue, good characters, and an excellent cast, Out of
Sight easily smoothes over the rough spots in the plot and delivers on
both the action and romantic fronts.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 30 July 1998 with Andrea at the SONY Lincoln Square for $9
Knowing that Out of Sight was from "the makers of Get Shorty" was like
saying "from the makers of Illtown starring Tony Danza." Most everyone I
know (okay, just Cathy), hated Get Shorty, but many liked this one. So, I
caved in to the demands of a boring summer, moviewise, as American-made
summer fare goes, and parted with $9. 
Well, no one told me Steven Soderbergh directed it, did they? Out of Sight
lived up to the positive word of mouth, and while I enjoyed it and
recommend it, now that I am out of the cool glow of the movie screen, I
cannot tell you why I enjoyed it so much.
Well, three things. First, there's the very interesting camera work for
which Soderbergh (sex, lies, and videotape, and Kafka) is known. Second,
the utterly charming George Clooney's characterization of Jack Foley, who
assiduously talks bank tellers into handing over lots of unmarked bills
taking advantage of his observations yet never raising his voice, or a
gun. Third, some of the writing was just superb. Clooney's interaction
with his co-stars is a lot of fun to listen to. His flirtation with Lopez
while actively evading her was entertaining, however unrealistic.
So what didn't I like? Well, charm and sex appeal aside, what makes a
smart US Marshall like Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez) risk it all to help
out a felon? Yeah, exactly. Makes no sense. So Out of Sight might just be
referring to the many ways we get to see her, cop with an hourglass
figure, slink around in what is clearly not regulation uniform, toting a
rifle.
Also, the easy-to-follow-yet-complex plot is interesting, well paced but
not exactly engrossing. This is one of the two dozen adaptations of Elmore
Leonard's novels for the big screen since 1957, and after seeing Jackie
Brown, and seeing my brother dozing through it, that was not an attraction
either.
But, it is good summer moviegoing or future rental fare, for light, fluffy
entertainment with a little bite and a less than predictable plot. Above
average for what it is, but not compelling either. Catherine Keener, Luis
Guzman, Dennis Farina, Michael Keaton, Albert Brooks, Samuel L. Jackson,
and Nancy Allen turn in good performances, in roles of varying
performance.
Also noteworthy: original music by David Holmes (IV) and interesting
cinematography by Elliot Davis.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
Do you have memories of when a recognizable presence in the movies
suddenly finds the right script, and becomes a fully-developed star
right before your eyes?  Looking back, I will have pleasant memories of
"discovering" Bruce Willis in _Die Hard_, Julia Roberts in _Pretty
Woman_, and "rediscovering" John Travolta in _Pulp Fiction_.
Well, fasten your seatbelts, folks.  George Clooney and Jennifer Lopez
have done it.  After a couple of false starts, Clooney (who had a
smaller role as _Batman_ than Alfred the butler) and Lopez (a.k.a.
_Selena_), have broken out of their schlock and become cinema's latest
smart, hot, sassiest couple.  It also makes a strong comeback for
Stephen Soderbergh, who broke new ground with _sex, lies, and videotape_
nine years ago.
The film starts intriguingly as a disgruntled Jack Foley (Clooney) walks
out of an office building, furiously throwing his tie onto the ground.
The film pauses at that moment; this is Soderbergh saying, "Did you
catch that?"  Over the course of the two hours, you will know the reason
for his anger, and his impromptu decision afterwards:  to rob a bank.
Foley pulls off one of the most suave, gunless bank robberies in movie
memory.  But after he does so, the film double-crosses itself, and he is
easily caught after his car won't start.  Such great twists are
reminiscent of the film--smart people doing crazy things, and being done
in by life's unpredictabilities.  It's a great theme, and plays real
well here.
Foley lands in prison.  Only a matter of time will come where he will
escape, and inadvertantly run into Federal Marshall Karen Sisco (Lopez),
who wastes no time in using her birthday present-a flashy pistol.  The
two are subsequently locked in the trunk of the getaway car, where the
sparks of an unexpected romance begin to brew.  Days later, she's still
thinking about him.
This all serves as the opening premise of a wildly imaginative ride that
uses the talents of Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle, Steve Zahn, Dennis Farina,
and a couple of pleasant unbilled cameos.  Returning from the dead of
movieland hell is Nancy Allen, aging gracefully.  And stealing the show
is Albert Brooks, even if his bald-wig is a little too obvious in some
scenes.
_Out of Sight_ isn't perfect.  Some of the scenes are a little too talky
and Soderbergh's expiremental film style sometimes backlashes against
him.  I also found a few of the action scenes to be too easy;
screenwriter Scott Frank (who also wrote _Get Shorty_, both of which
originated from Elmore Leonard pulp) was not too concerned with great
action sequences as he is with great dialogue.  A good call, but it made
me wanting more.
As for Clooney and Lopez, genuine star-power has come with a mighty gust
of class and sass.  Take a breath of the new wind.  Get thee to a
multiplex now.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Out of Sight (1998)
George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle, Dennis Farina, 
Albert Brooks, Steve Zahn, Luis Guzman, Catherine Keener, Isaiah 
Washington, Keith Loneker, Nancy Allen, Michael Keaton (uncredited), 
Samuel L. Jackson (uncredited). Screenplay by Scott Frank, based on the 
Elmore Leonard novel. Directed by Steven Soderbergh. 122 minutes.
Rated R, 4 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
Quirky, smart and extremely entertaining, "Out of Sight" establishes its 
tone right from the opening scene. Bank robber Jack Foley (George 
Clooney) ambles up to a teller and lays out the score with casually 
authoritative inflection. Gesturing towards a total stranger applying for 
a loan at a nearby desk, he quietly states that the man is his partner 
who, if instructions are not followed to the letter, will shoot the bank 
officer. As the trembling employee gathers the cash, Foley notices her 
near-panic and says, with genuine concern in his voice, "Your first time 
being robbed? Well, you're doing great." After calming the young woman 
and collecting his bounty, he strolls out to the parking lot under the 
sunny Florida sky to make his escape, only to discover that his car won't 
start. 30 seconds later, he's under arrest.
"Out of Sight" is the first film based on an Elmore Leonard novel that 
truly captures the author's unique style. "Get Shorty" was lively fun, 
but overly glib. While "Jackie Brown" was a thoughtful, exceptionally 
well done character study, the production suffered from a detached, logy 
feel. In the hands of "sex, lies & videotape" director Steven Soderbergh, 
"Out of Sight" delivers the goods, adroitly mixing romance, violence and 
humor without compromising its characters or oversimplifying the story. 
Leonard writes in nonjudgmental fashion about oddly endearing lowlifes. 
His characters are lovable losers who make us laugh precisely because 
they don't know how funny they are. Soderbergh understands all of that, 
which is why the film works so well.
The story follows Jack to prison, where he quickly plots his escape. Of 
course, the break-out doesn't go as planned, thanks to the unexpected 
appearance of federal marshal Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez). Jack's 
accomplice Buddy (Ving Rhames), scrambling to protect his friend, stuffs 
Jack and Karen into a car trunk for the getaway run, and sparks fly 
between the pair. After Buddy and Jack release her and head for Detroit, 
planning the proverbial "one last scam," Karen aggressively pursues Jack, 
although it's obvious that she's not entirely sure what she'll do if she 
catches him. 
While "Out of Sight" boasts a terrific cast, the spotlight rarely moves 
far from George Clooney and Jennifer Lopez, who deliver knockout 
performances. Any doubts over whether Clooney can carry a film are 
removed here, as he deftly creates a charismatic, delightfully 
complicated scoundrel. Short sighted but fast on his feet, Jack presents 
himself with a beguiling assurance that never seems cocky. He's 
incredibly likable, even while doing awful things. Clooney looks good too,
 having finally ditched that silly Julius Caesar hairdo that was so 
trendy for a while, in favor of a swept back look befitting a movie star. 
Speaking of movie stars, Jennifer Lopez becomes a full-fledged one here 
as well, with a breakthrough performance as the perceptive, sexy and very 
conflicted federal marshal. Make no mistake, Karen Sisco is an effective 
cop, but she keeps finding herself drawn to the wrong men. Early in the 
film, her father (an uncharacteristically tender Dennis Farina) gently 
offers counsel on her personal life, all the while knowing that his 
resolute daughter must find her own way, however often she may stumble. 
And stumble she will, because this is an Elmore Leonard story, where the 
good guys are usually bad guys and everybody screws up. Sometimes they 
even realize the futility of their grandiose plans, although that never 
seems to slow them down. In one of the most telling scenes, Buddy talks 
about living the good life after they pull off their risky plan and Jack 
quietly says "You know anybody who has done the big score and gone on to 
live the good life?" 
The characters in "Out of Sight" may be sad sacks, but boy, are they fun 
to watch. Along with the always wonderful Rhames and Farina, the film 
boasts a stellar supporting cast including Albert Brooks (as a Michael 
Milken type), Don Cheadle from "Boogie Nights," "That Thing You Do's" 
Steve Zahn, plus uncredited appearances from Michael Keaton, reprising 
his "Jackie Brown" role as FBI agent Ray Nicolet, and Samuel L. Jackson. 
Despite the large cast, every character is fully developed and their 
stories weave in and out, aided by a loping, low key jazz score that 
accents the film's non-linear flow. 
It's all very complicated, but attentive viewers can easily keep up, and 
even if you do get lost, that's okay, because character is far more 
important than plot in "Out of Sight." The film has a number of intricate,
 beautifully staged set pieces, but even those dandy action scenes are 
character driven. The deliciously loopy "Out of Sight" takes a whacked 
look at the human condition, painting life as a series of misguided 
choices, a viewpoint that would be depressing if it wasn't so damned 
funny.
